District of Columbia statutes.
34-1120

Commission to fix adequate and serviceable standards; regulations for testing products, service, and meters.

The Commission shall ascertain and fix adequate and serviceable standards for the measurement of quality, pressure, initial voltage, or other condition pertaining to the supply of the product or service rendered by any public utility, and prescribe reasonable regulations for examining and testing such product or service and for the measurement thereof. It shall establish reasonable rules, regulations, specifications, and standards to secure the accuracy of all meters and appliances for measurements, and every public utility is required to carry into effect all orders issued by the Commission relative thereto.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 980, ch. 150, § 8, par. 21
1973 Ed., § 43-320.
1981 Ed., § 43-520.
Public Service Commission, creation, powers and duties, see § 34-802.
Gas and electric meters, inspections, rules and regulations, see § 34-303.